Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.050

Partnership as entity.

(1) A partnership is an entity distinct from its partners.

(2) A limited liability partnership continues to be the same entity that existed before the filing of an application under RCW 25.05.500(2).

[ 2000 c 169 s 10; 1998 c 103 s 201.]